Wisconsin, session 2025, AB565.
do enact as follows:AB565,11Section 1. 238.15 (1) (b) of the statutes is repealed.AB565,22Section 2. 238.15 (1) (Lg) of the statutes is amended to read:AB565,2,63238.15 (1) (Lg) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2017, and 4before January 1, 2026, it has not received more than $12,000,000 in investments 5that have qualified for tax credits under ss. 71.07 (5b) and (5d), 71.28 (5b), 71.47 6(5b), and 76.638.AB565,37Section 3. 238.15 (1) (Lj) of the statutes is created to read:AB565,2,108238.15 (1) (Lj) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, it has 9not received more than $20,000,000 in investments that have qualified for tax 10credits under ss. 71.07 (5b) and (5d), 71.28 (5b), 71.47 (5b), and 76.638.AB565,411Section 4. 238.15 (1) (m) 1. (intro.) of the statutes is renumbered 238.15 (1) 12(m) 1. and amended to read:AB565,3,213238.15 (1) (m) 1. It agrees that it will not relocate outside of this state during 14the 3 years after it receives an investment for which a person may claim a tax credit 15under s. 71.07 (5d) and agrees to pay the corporation a penalty, in an amount 16determined under subd. 2., if the business relocates outside of this state during that 173-year period. For the purposes of this paragraph, except as provided in policies 18and procedures under sub. (3) (dm), a business relocates outside of this state when 1the business locates more than 51 percent of any of the following its headquarters, 2as defined by the corporation’s policies and procedures, outside of this state:.AB565,53Section 5. 238.15 (1) (m) 1. a. to c. of the statutes are repealed.AB565,64Section 6. 238.15 (3) (dm) of the statutes is repealed.AB565,3,55